firefox-addon/dictionaries/tr.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyecektir ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyeceğim emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyeceğim imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyeceğim ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyeceğimdir emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyeceğimdir imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyeceğimdir ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyeceğiz emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyeceğiz imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyeceğiz ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyeceğizdir emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyeceğizdir imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyeceğizdir ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyeli emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyeli imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyeli ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyelim emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyelim imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyelim ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyemeden emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyemeden imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyemeden ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyen emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyen imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyen ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyen/∙∂≢∦≊∫∢≈∹≂∲∶∽≄≧ emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyen/∙∂≢∦≊∫∢≈∹≂∲∶∽≄≧ imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyen/∙∂≢∦≊∫∢≈∹≂∲∶∽≄≧ ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyerek emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyerek imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyerek ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyerken emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyerken imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyerken ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyesi emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyesi imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyesi ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyesi/∛≥≽∦≊≬≩≈∹≂∲∶∽≄≧ emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyesi/∛≥≽∦≊≬≩≈∹≂∲∶∽≄≧ imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyesi/∛≥≽∦≊≬≩≈∹≂∲∶∽≄≧ ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyeyim emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyeyim imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyeyim ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyici emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyici imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyici ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyici/∛≥≽∦≊≬≩≈∹≂∲∶∽≄≧ emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyici/∛≥≽∦≊≬≩≈∹≂∲∶∽≄≧ imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyici/∛≥≽∦≊≬≩≈∹≂∲∶∽≄≧ ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyin emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyin imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyin ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyince emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyince imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyince ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyinceye emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyinceye imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyinceye ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyiniz emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyiniz imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyiniz ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyip emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyip imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyip ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyirken emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyirken imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyirken ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyiz emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyiz imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyiz ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyizdir emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyizdir imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyizdir ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyiş emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyiş imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyiş ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeyiş/∙∂≢∦≊∫∢≈∹≂∲∶∽≄≧ emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeyiş/∙∂≢∦≊∫∢≈∹≂∲∶∽≄≧ imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeyiş/∙∂≢∦≊∫∢≈∹≂∲∶∽≄≧ ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmez emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmez imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmez ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmez/∙∂≢∦≊∫∢≈∹≂∲∶∽≄≧ emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmez/∙∂≢∦≊∫∢≈∹≂∲∶∽≄≧ imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmez/∙∂≢∦≊∫∢≈∹≂∲∶∽≄≧ ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezdi emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezdi imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezdi ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezdik emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezdik imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezdik ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezdiler/≧ emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezdiler/≧ imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezdiler/≧ ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezdim emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezdim imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezdim ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezdin emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezdin imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezdin ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezdiniz emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezdiniz imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezdiniz ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezdir emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezdir imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezdir ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezken emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezken imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezken ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezler/≧ emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezler/≧ imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezler/≧ ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezlerdi emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezlerdi imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezlerdi ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezlerdir emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezlerdir imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezlerdir ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezlerken emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezlerken imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezlerken ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezlerse emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezlerse imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezlerse ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezmiş emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezmiş imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezmiş ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezmişim emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezmişim imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezmişim ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezmişiz emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezmişiz imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezmişiz ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezmişler/≧ emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezmişler/≧ imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezmişler/≧ ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezmişsin emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezmişsin imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezmişsin ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezmişsiniz emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezmişsiniz imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezmişsiniz ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezse emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezse imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezse ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezsek emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezsek imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezsek ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezseler/≧ emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezseler/≧ imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezseler/≧ ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezsem emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezsem imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezsem ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezsen emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezsen imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezsen ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezseniz emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezseniz imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezseniz ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezsin emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezsin imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezsin ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezsindir emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezsindir imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezsindir ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezsiniz emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezsiniz imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezsiniz ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmezsinizdir emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmezsinizdir imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmezsinizdir ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmeztir emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmeztir imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmeztir ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyor emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyor imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyor ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyordu emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyordu imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyordu ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyorduk emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyorduk imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyorduk ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyordum emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyordum imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyordum ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyordun emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyordun imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyordun ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyordunuz emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyordunuz imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyordunuz ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyordur emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyordur imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyordur ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyorken emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyorken imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyorken ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyorlar/∎ emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyorlar/∎ imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyorlar/∎ ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyorlardı emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyorlardı imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyorlardı ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyorlardır emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyorlardır imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyorlardır ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyorlarmış emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyorlarmış imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyorlarmış ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyorlarsa emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyorlarsa imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyorlarsa ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyormuş emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyormuş imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyormuş ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyormuşlar/∎ emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyormuşlar/∎ imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyormuşlar/∎ ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyormuşsun emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyormuşsun imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyormuşsun ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyormuşsunuz emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyormuşsunuz imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyormuşsunuz ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyormuşum emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyormuşum imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyormuşum ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyormuşuz emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyormuşuz imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyormuşuz ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyorsa emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyorsa imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyorsa ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyorsak emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyorsak imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyorsak ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyorsalar/∎ emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyorsalar/∎ imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyorsalar/∎ ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyorsam emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyorsam imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyorsam ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyorsan emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyorsan imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyorsan ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyorsanız emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyorsanız imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyorsanız ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyorsun emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyorsun imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyorsun ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyorsundur emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyorsundur imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyorsundur ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyorsunuz emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyorsunuz imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyorsunuz ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyorsunuzdur emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyorsunuzdur imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyorsunuzdur ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyorum emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyorum imek
SFX ≔ ümek üyünmüyorum ümek
SFX ≔ emek eyinmiyorumdur emek
SFX ≔ imek iyinmiyorumdur imek
