firefox-addon/dictionaries/tr.dic
afişlemek/≔
aprelemek/≔
arşivlemek/≔
ateşlemek/≔
badiklemek/≔
beklemek/≔
belemek/≔
belgelemek/≔
belgilemek/≔
beliklemek/≔
belinlemek/≔
belirlemek/≔
belitlemek/≔
bellemek/≔
beneklemek/≔
bengilemek/≔
benildemek/≔
benimsemek/≔
bentlemek/≔
benzemek/≔
benzinlemek/≔
berelemek/≔
berkimek/≔
beselemek/≔
beslemek/≔
bestelemek/≔
betimlemek/≔
bezeklemek/≔
bezelemek/≔
bezemek/≔
bezirlemek/≔
bezlemek/≔
beşlemek/≔
biberlemek/≔
bilemek/≔
bilgilemek/≔
bilmezlemek/≔
birlemek/≔
bitlemek/≔
bizlemek/≔
biçemlemek/≔
biçimlemek/≔
briketlemek/≔
bölgelemek/≔
bütçelemek/≔
ceplemek/≔
ciltlemek/≔
darbelemek/≔
deflemek/≔
dehlemek/≔
demetlemek/≔
demirlemek/≔
demlemek/≔
denemek/≔
denetlemek/≔
deneyimlemek/≔
deneyimlemek/≔
deneylemek/≔
dengelemek/≔
denklemek/≔
derecelemek/≔
dergilemek/≔
derlemek/≔
desenlemek/≔
desteklemek/≔
destelemek/≔
değerlemek/≔
değirmilemek/≔
değneklemek/≔
deşelemek/≔
didiklemek/≔
dikizlemek/≔
dilemek/≔
dilimlemek/≔
dinamitlemek/≔
dingildemek/≔
dinlemek/≔
diplemek/≔
dipçiklemek/≔
diremek/≔
direnlemek/≔
dirgenlemek/≔
dirseklemek/≔
dizelemek/≔
dizginlemek/≔
dizilemek/≔
dizinlemek/≔
dizlemek/≔
dişemek/≔
dişeğilemek/≔
dişlemek/≔
dopinglemek/≔
dönelemek/≔
düvesimek/≔
düzenlemek/≔
düğmelemek/≔
ebelemek/≔
eklemek/≔
eklemlemek/≔
ekşimek/≔
elektriklemek/≔
elemek/≔
ellemek/≔
emeklemek/≔
emlemek/≔
emreylemek/≔
enciklemek/≔
endazelemek/≔
endekslemek/≔
enemek/≔
engellemek/≔
eniklemek/≔
enselemek/≔
eprimek/≔
ergimek/≔
erginlemek/≔
erimek/≔
ersemek/≔
ertelemek/≔
eselemek/≔
esenlemek/≔
esinlemek/≔
esirgemek/≔
eskimek/≔
eslemek/≔
esnemek/≔
esrimek/≔
eteklemek/≔
etenelemek/≔
eterlemek/≔
etiketlemek/≔
etkilemek/≔
etkimek/≔
evetlemek/≔
evleklemek/≔
evsemek/≔
eylemek/≔
eğelemek/≔
eşelemek/≔
eşlemek/≔
fetheylemek/≔
fihristlemek/≔
filizlemek/≔
fingirdemek/≔
fiskelemek/≔
fitlemek/≔
fişeklemek/≔
flitlemek/≔
frezelemek/≔
garantilemek/≔
gebrelemek/≔
gemlemek/≔
genişlemek/≔
gerekçelemek/≔
gerçeklemek/≔
gevremek/≔
gezelemek/≔
geçerlemek/≔
girenlemek/≔
gölgelemek/≔
göresimek/≔
gözlemlemek/≔
güdelemek/≔
güncellemek/≔
güvencelemek/≔
hafiflemek/≔
hançerlemek/≔
hayallemek/≔
hedeflemek/≔
hidrojenlemek/≔
hiçlemek/≔
ikilemek/≔
ilgilemek/≔
ilintilemek/≔
ilmiklemek/≔
imek/≔⊎⊏⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕
imlemek/≔
indirgemek/≔
inhibe/≔
inilemek/≔
ipilemek/≔
ipoteklemek/≔
islemek/≔
istiflemek/≔
itelemek/≔
içerlemek/≔
işaretlemek/≔
işlemek/≔
jurnallemek/≔
kafeslemek/≔
karelemek/≔
kefelemek/≔
kekelemek/≔
keleplemek/≔
kementlemek/≔
kemrelemek/≔
kepçelemek/≔
keselemek/≔
keçelemek/≔
kilitlemek/≔
kiplemek/≔
kireçsilemek/≔
kitlemek/≔
kredilemek/≔
köpeklemek/≔
köteklemek/≔
köşelemek/≔
kündelemek/≔
lanetlemek/≔
lekelemek/≔
listelemek/≔
madiklemek/≔
maskelemek/≔
melezlemek/≔
merdanelemek/≔
merkezlemek/≔
minelemek/≔
modellemek/≔
mührelemek/≔
mürekkeplemek/≔
naftalinlemek/≔
nefeslemek/≔
nicelemek/≔
nitelemek/≔
oksitlemek/≔
paniklemek/≔
parametrelemek/≔
parsellemek/≔
pençelemek/≔
perdelemek/≔
perçinlemek/≔
peçelemek/≔
pislemek/≔
poşetlemek/≔
raptiyelemek/≔
rendelemek/≔
resimlemek/≔
rimellemek/≔
sabitlemek/≔
sahnelemek/≔
sekilemek/≔
semerlemek/≔
sendelemek/≔
sepelemek/≔
sepilemek/≔
sergilemek/≔
serpelemek/≔
seslemek/≔
sezinlemek/≔
silkelemek/≔
sinirlemek/≔
sobelemek/≔
sünnetlemek/≔
süzgeçlemek/≔
tarihlemek/≔
tasdiklemek/≔
tazelemek/≔
tekerlemek/≔
teklemek/≔
tekmillemek/≔
tellemek/≔
temizlemek/≔
tepelemek/≔
tepirlemek/≔
terazilemek/≔
terlemek/≔
tertiplemek/≔
tetiklemek/≔
teyellemek/≔
tipilemek/≔
tirelemek/≔
titremek/≔
torpillemek/≔
tüneklemek/≔
vergilemek/≔
vitrinlemek/≔
yeleklemek/≔
yellemek/≔
yelpirdemek/≔
yemlemek/≔
yestehlemek/≔
yeğnilemek/≔
yinelemek/≔
yükseltgemek/≔
zedelemek/≔
zenginlemek/≔
zimmetlemek/≔
çekelemek/≔
çekimlemek/≔
çeliklemek/≔
çemberlemek/≔
çemremek/≔
çenilemek/≔
çepellemek/≔
çevrelemek/≔
çeyizlemek/≔
çeşitlemek/≔
çiftelemek/≔
çilemek/≔
çimek/≔⊎⊏⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕
çirişlemek/≔
çiselemek/≔
çitilemek/≔
çivilemek/≔
çiylemek/≔
çizelgelemek/≔
çiçeklemek/≔
çiğnemek/≔
ödencelemek/≔
ökselemek/≔
ölçeklemek/≔
önemsemek/≔
örneklemek/≔
örselemek/≔
özdeşlemek/≔
üstelemek/≔
şandellemek/≔
şerbetlemek/≔
şiflemek/≔
şiniklemek/≔
şişlemek/≔
